Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Right to Attend School
§ 21-4-309.
Mandatory immunizations for children attending schools; exceptions.

Any person attending, full or part time, any public or private school, kindergarten through twelfth grade, shall within thirty (30) days after the date of school entry, provide to the appropriate school official written documentary proof of immunization. For purposes of this section, documentary proof of immunization is written certification by a private licensed physician or his representative or by any public health authority, that the person is fully immunized. Documentation shall include month, day and year of each required immunization received against vaccine preventable disease as designated by the state health authority. No school administrator shall permit a student to attend school for more than thirty (30) calendar days without documentary proof of immunization. If immunization requires a series of immunizations over a period of more than thirty (30) calendar days, the child shall be permitted to attend school while receiving continuing immunization if the school administrator receives written notification by a private licensed physician or his representative or by a public health official, specifying a written schedule for necessary immunization completion within the medically accepted time period. Waivers shall be authorized by the state or county health officer upon submission of written evidence of religious objection or medical contraindication to the administration of any vaccine. In the presence of an outbreak of vaccine preventable disease as determined by the state or county health authority, school children for whom a waiver has been issued and who are not immunized against the occurring vaccine preventable disease shall be excluded from school attendance for a period of time determined by the state or county health authority, but not suspended from school as provided in W.S.

21-4-305

. Children excluded from school attendance under this section shall not be counted in the aggregate number of pupils absent as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i).

The school administrator shall be responsible for an audit of the immunization status of any child enrolled in the school in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the department of health.

The written documented proof of immunization on a form provided by the state health officer shall be an integral part of the child’s school record.

For purposes of this section:

“State health officer” means the person appointed by the governor pursuant to W.S. 9-2-103(e);

“County health officer” means the licensed medical officer designated by the county commissioners to serve as health officer for his county;

“Immunized” or “immunization” means initial immunization and any boosters or reimmunizations required to maintain immunization pursuant to the immunization standards and recommendations issued by the state health officer.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 23, § 1; 1987, ch. 3, § 1; 1991, ch. 30, § 2; ch. 221, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2021 ch. 168, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d)(i), substituted “9-2-103” for “9-2-101(f).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (d)(i), substituted “governor” for “director of the department of health” and “9-2-103(e)” for “9-2-103.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 4, provides: "This act shall only apply to orders issued by the state health officer or municipal, county or district health officers on or after the effective date of this act. No order issued before the effective date of this act shall be subject to this act during any period for which the public health order is effective."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Waiver of immunization. —

The statute clearly requires a waiver to be issued upon receipt of written evidence of a medical contraindication to the administration of any vaccine, and the statute does not require that a specific reason be given for a medical contraindication. Jones v. State Dep't of Health, 2001 WY 28, 18 P.3d 1189,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2001).

The statute mandates the issuance of an exemption from immunization for school children upon a written religious objection and does not permit an inquiry by the department of health into the sincerity of the religious beliefs of an applicant. LePage v. State (In re LePage), 2001 WY 26, 18 P.3d 1177,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: pertussis vaccine manufacturers, 57 ALR4th 911.

Power of court or other public agency to order vaccination over parental religious objection, 94 ALR5th 613.

§ 21-4-310.
Self-administration of medication for potentially life threatening conditions.

The district board shall permit a student to possess and self-administer within any school of the district medication required for potentially life threatening conditions if a written statement is submitted to the district containing applicable:

Parental verification that the student is responsible for and capable of self-administration and parental authorization for self-administration of medication required for potentially life threatening conditions;

Health care provider identification of the prescribed or authorized medication required for potentially life threatening conditions and verification of the appropriateness of the student’s possession and self-administration of the medication required for potentially life threatening conditions.

The written statement shall be prescribed by the department of education, with the assistance of the department of health, and shall require the signatures of the parent or guardian of the student and the student’s physician or physician’s representative.

As used in this section:

“Asthma medication” means prescription or nonprescription inhaled asthma medication;

“Potentially life threatening conditions” includes, but is not limited to asthma, food allergies and insect bites;

“Medication required for potentially life threatening conditions” includes, but is not limited to asthma medication and prescription single dose epinephrine pens.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 115, § 1; 2007, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

rewrote (a) to substitute “medication required for potentially life threatening conditions” for “asthma medication” throughout; added (c)(ii) and (c)(iii) and made related changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 98, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 115, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 21-4-311.
Safe school climate act; short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe School Climate Act”.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-4-312.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Harassment, intimidation or bullying” means any intentional gesture, any intentional electronic communication or any intentional written, verbal or physical act initiated, occurring or received at school that a reasonable person under the circumstances should know will have the effect of:

Harming a student physically or emotionally, damaging a student’s property or placing a student in reasonable fear of personal harm or property damage;

Insulting or demeaning a student or group of students causing substantial disruption in, or substantial interference with, the orderly operation of the school; or

Creating an intimidating, threatening or abusive educational environment for a student or group of students through sufficiently severe, persistent or pervasive behavior.

“School” includes a classroom or other location on school premises, a school bus or other school-related vehicle, a school bus stop, an activity or event sponsored by a school, whether or not it is held on school premises, and any other program or function where the school is responsible for the child;

“This act” means W.S.

21-4-311

through

21-4-315

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-4-313.
Prohibition against harassment, intimidation or bullying; reporting to school officials.

No person shall engage in:

Harassment, intimidation or bullying; or

Reprisal or retaliation against a victim, witness or person who reports information about an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-4-314.
School district implementation; state policies, training and technical assistance.

Not later than December 31, 2009, each school district shall adopt a policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying at school. The school district shall involve parents and guardians, school employees, volunteers, students, administrators and community representatives in the process of creating the policy. Policies created under this section shall be continuously reviewed and may be revised as necessary.

The policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying shall include, without limitation:

A statement prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying of a student;

A definition of “harassment, intimidation or bullying” which includes at minimum the definition as provided in W.S. 21-4-312(a)(i);

Consequences and appropriate remedial actions for persons committing acts of harassment, intimidation or bullying or engaging in reprisal or retaliation;

Procedures for reporting and documenting acts of harassment, intimidation or bullying, including a provision for reporting anonymously. However, formal disciplinary action shall not be taken solely on the basis of an anonymous report. The procedures shall identify the appropriate school personnel responsible for receiving a report and investigating a complaint;

Procedures for prompt investigation of reports or complaints of serious violations;

A statement that prohibits reprisal or retaliation against a person who reports or makes a complaint of harassment, intimidation or bullying;

A strategy for protecting a victim from additional harassment, intimidation or bullying, and from retaliation following a report;

Consequences and appropriate remedial action for a person who is found to have made a false accusation, report or complaint;

A process for discussing the district’s harassment, intimidation or bullying policy with students; and

A statement of how the policy is to be publicized, including notice that the policy applies to participation in functions sponsored by the school.

To assist local school districts in developing a policy under subsection (b) of this section, the department of education shall not later than September 1, 2009, develop model policies applicable to grades kindergarten through twelve (12) and teacher preparation program standards on the identification and prevention of bullying. In addition, the department shall provide necessary training programs and technical assistance to districts in carrying out this act.

Each local school board shall include the policy adopted by a school district pursuant to this section in a publication of the comprehensive rules, procedures and standards of conduct for schools of a school district and in each school’s student’s handbook.

Information regarding the school district’s policy against harassment, intimidation or bullying shall be incorporated into each district’s professional development programs and shall be provided to volunteers and other noncertified employees of the district who have significant contact with students.

School districts may establish bullying prevention programs or other initiatives and may involve school staff, students, administrators, volunteers, parents, law enforcement and community members.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-4-315.
Applicability; no civil liability created; immunity.

This article shall not be interpreted to prevent a victim from seeking redress pursuant to any other applicable civil or criminal law. This article does not create or alter any civil cause of action for monetary damages against any person or school district nor shall it constitute grounds for any claim or motion raised by either the state or defendant in any proceedings, except that the defense of immunity shall be retained and may be asserted in any action arising under this act.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-4-316.
Administration of stock epinephrine auto-injectors.

A district board may adopt and implement a policy whereby the district may acquire, maintain and dispense to schools within the district a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors. Upon authorization by the board, school nurses and assigned school personnel may administer a stock epinephrine auto-injector to a student that the school nurse or assigned school personnel in good faith believes is experiencing a severe allergic reaction. A district board shall not be required to obtain a prescription to acquire, maintain or dispense to schools within the district a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors under this section. A district board may enter into arrangements with manufacturers or third-party suppliers of epinephrine auto-injectors to obtain the epinephrine auto-injectors at fair market, free or reduced prices.

A district board that decides to acquire, maintain and dispense a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors shall:

Implement a plan based on the guidelines developed pursuant to this section for the management of students with life threatening allergies enrolled in the schools within the district;

Make the plan available on the school district’s website or the website of each school within the district, or if such websites do not exist, make the plan publicly available through other practicable means as determined by the board.

Not later than December 31, 2014, the department of education, in consultation with the department of health, shall develop and make available to all schools guidelines for the management of students with life threatening allergies. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to:

Identification of life threatening allergies or severe allergic reactions qualifying for administration of epinephrine auto-injectors under this act;

Identification of appropriate and acceptable epinephrine auto-injectors;

Education and training for school personnel on the management of students with life threatening allergies, including training related to the administration of epinephrine auto-injectors;

Procedures for responding to life threatening allergies;

A process for the development of individualized health care and allergy action plans for every student with a life threatening allergy;

Protocols to prevent exposure to allergens;

Requirements for each school to keep a record of each incident that involves a life threatening allergy or the administration of stock epinephrine auto-injectors;

Requirements for schools that have adopted a policy allowing for the administration of stock epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to this section to maintain a list of employees in the school or school district who have been trained and assigned to administer stock epinephrine auto-injectors;

Requirements for school nurses and assigned school personnel to confirm completion of a training program approved by the department of education, in consultation with the department of health.

A school that possesses and makes available stock epinephrine auto-injectors and those persons specified in this subsection shall not be liable for damages for any injuries that result from the administration of, self-administration of, or failure to administer epinephrine auto-injectors that may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity applies regardless of whether authorization was provided by the student’s parent or guardian or by the student’s health care provider. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross, willful or wanton negligence. The administration of stock epinephrine auto-injectors in accordance with this section is not the practice of medicine. The immunity from liability provided under this section is in addition to and not in lieu of that provided under W.S.

1-1-120

. The immunity provided in this subsection extends to:

A district board, school nurses, employees, agents and volunteers of the district;

An authorized health care provider who prescribes stock epinephrine auto-injectors; and

An individual or entity that conducts the training described in this section.

As used in this section:

“Administer” or “administration” means the direct application of a stock epinephrine auto-injector;

“Assigned school personnel” means an employee, agent or volunteer of a school designated by the administrator of the school who has completed the training required under this section to provide or administer stock epinephrine auto-injectors;

“Authorized health care provider” means an individual authorized by law to prescribe and administer prescription drugs in the course of professional practice;

“Provide” means the supply of one (1) or more stock epinephrine auto-injectors;

“Stock epinephrine” means injectable medications used for the treatment of severe, life-threatening allergies that schools or districts buy and keep on-site for emergency use.

Nothing in this section shall be held to apply to or affect W.S.

21-4-310

.

History:

2014 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 43, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.